California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34022.

“Assessor” means the assessor of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34023.

“Collector” means the tax collector of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34024.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34025.

“General district election” means the district election required to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34026.

“Holder of title” shall mean the owner of record of the fee title to land; provided, however, in the event the owner of record of such fee title has conveyed the equitable title to such land by way of a land sale contract and such contract or a memorandum thereof is recorded, “holder of title” shall mean the contract vendee thereunder and not the record owner of the fee title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1157.)
-------------------------------------------

34027.

“Voter” means a person who is a holder of title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34028.

“Board of election” means a board consisting of an inspector and two judges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34029.

“Irrigation” includes subirrigation, percolation, underground storage, and well replenishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34030.

“Legal representative” means either of the following:

(a) A duly appointed and acting guardian, executor, or administrator of the estate of a holder of title to land.

(b) A person duly authorized to act for, and on behalf of, a holder of title to land that is not a natural person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

34031.

“Property” embraces all real and personal property, including water, water rights, works, easements, and rights of way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34032.

“Contract” includes agreement, lease, conveyance, and obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34033.

“Works” includes works to supply water for domestic, industrial, and municipal purposes, irrigation works, drainage works, reclamation works, distributing systems, dams, reservoirs, and canals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

34034.

“Charges” includes tolls and rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34035.

“Bonds” includes both general obligation bonds and revenue bonds except as otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34036.

Whenever by this division a notice is required to be published for a designated number of weeks or once a week for a designated number of weeks, the notice need be published on only one day of each week and for only the same number of times as the number of weeks designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [34050. - 34055.]

34050.

Nothing in this division changes or repeals any other law of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34051.

The rights, privileges, and immunities created or continued in force by the California Water District Act or by this division in favor of any holder of title to land may for his benefit and on his behalf be exercised by his legal representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34052.

Whenever an instrument is by this division required to be acknowledged, each signer shall acknowledge the instrument in the manner provided by law before his signature shall be effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34053.

No supervisor, auditor, or county elections official of any county shall receive any fee for any service required to be performed by him or her under the provisions of this division provided, however, that the county elections official shall be compensated for the expense of the conduct of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 161.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

34055.

Districts governed by this division are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [34150. - 34583.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition for Formation [34150. - 34182.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petitions and Presentation of Petition [34150. - 34157.]

34150.

Unless otherwise stated, in this part “board” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34151.

As used in this part, “petition” means a petition for the formation of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34152.

As used in this part, “election” means an election on the proposition of the formation of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34153.

The holders of title to a majority in area of land which is capable of using water beneficially for irrigation, domestic, industrial or municipal purposes and which can be serviced from common sources of supply and by the same system of works, may petition for the formation of a district.

The area need not be contiguous if:

(a) The portions of the proposed district are separated by land under the control of a state hospital, or

(b) The boundary of each of the portions of the proposed districts is within two miles of the boundary of another portion of the proposed district.

When a district is proposed to be formed from noncontiguous areas, the petition shall be signed by the holders of title of a majority of the assessed value of land within each of the noncontiguous areas proposed to be included within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

34154.

The petition shall be presented to the board of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34155.

The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34156.

The records of the United States land office for the district in which the land is located, the records of the State Lands Commission, and the records in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the land is situated are conclusive evidence of ownership of land for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34157.

The proposed district may include land situated in other distinctive district agencies of the State, including other water districts organized under the provisions of this division having different plans and purposes and the object of which is not the same. The organization of any district prior to the enactment of this section and which included lands in one or more distinctive district agencies of the State, including other water districts organized under the provisions of this division having different plans and purposes and the object of which is not the same, is hereby ratified and confirmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition [34165. - 34168.]

34165.

A petition shall contain:

(a) The name of the proposed district, which name shall contain the words “Water District.”

(b) A description of the proposed boundaries.

(c) The name of each affected county.

(d) The number of acres in the proposed district.

(e) The place where the principal business of the proposed district is to be transacted.

(f) The sources, which may be in the alternative, from which water for the uses of the district is to be secured.

(g) The signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

34166.

(a) If a consolidation of the offices of assessor and tax collector is deemed advisable in the formation of a district, the petitioners may request the consolidation in their petition. The board calling the election shall in its order therefor announce the consolidation, and at the election only one person shall be elected to fill the offices consolidated.

(b) If it is deemed advisable in the formation of a district that the offices of assessor and tax collector shall be filled by appointment, the petitioners may request the appointment of such officers in their petition. In such event, the assessor shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of Section 34711.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

34167.

The petition shall be accompanied by an undertaking, to be approved by the board, in a sum not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), conditioned that the sureties will pay all of the costs in connection with the formation in case the formation is not effected. The board may require an additional undertaking if in its judgment the costs in connection with the formation will exceed one-half of the amount of the undertaking submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34168.

Upon the approval by the board of the undertaking or of any additional undertaking which it may require, the board shall fix a time for the hearing of the petition, which shall be not less than 22 days and not more than 40 days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Publication [34180. - 34182.]

34180.

The clerk of the board shall cause a notice to be published at least once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county. The notice shall state each of the following:

(a) That the petition has been presented to the board.

(b) The time and place for the hearing.

(c) The text of the petition.

(d) The names signed to the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34181.

The first publication of the notice shall be at least 21 days before the day set for the hearing. If at the hearing it appears that the notice is defective in any material respect, the board shall set another time for the hearing and cause notice again to be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34182.

No clerical error in the published text of the petition and no error or omission in the publication of the names attached to the petition invalidates any action on the petition or deprives the board of jurisdiction to proceed in the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hearing and Order [34300. - 34308.]

34300.

During or prior to the hearing of the petition:

(a) Any holder of title to land may request the exclusion of any part of his land from the proposed district.

(b) Any holder of title to land not within the proposed district but contiguous to any part of it and susceptible to irrigation from any source named in the petition may request in writing the inclusion of the land in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34301.

At the hearing the board shall hear all relevant evidence in support of or in opposition to the petition, or in support of or in opposition to requests for inclusion of land in or exclusion of land from the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34302.

The hearing may be continued by the board from time to time but shall not be continued after 30 days from the time originally fixed for the hearing, except from day to day, if any petitioner objects to the continuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34302.5.

Following such hearing, the board may terminate the proceeding if it finds that there is good cause for not forming the district. If proceedings are not terminated, the board shall make the determinations, findings, or orders as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

34303.

At the hearing the board shall fix the boundaries of the proposed district if it is shown to the board that the petition conforms to the requirements of this division and that the required notice of the hearing has been given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34304.

The board shall exclude any land which it finds will not be benefited by the water service of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

34305.

Upon application of the owner the board may include in the proposed district any land which is susceptible of water service from any source proposed in the petition and will be benefited by the water service if in the judgment of the board the proposed district will have or may obtain a sufficient supply of water for the water service of that land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

34306.

After the board has determined the land to be included within the proposed district, it shall make an order doing all of the following:

(a) Establishing and describing the exterior boundaries of the proposed district.

(b) Describing any land within the boundaries which is to be excluded from the district.

(c) Naming the proposed district, which name may be either the name proposed in the petition or another name determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34307.

The order shall be entered in full upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34308.

A finding of the board in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and notice is conclusive against all persons except the State in a quo warranto proceeding brought by the Attorney General and commenced before the district has instituted a proceeding to determine the legality of its existence or within one year after the making and entry of the order of the board establishing and describing the boundaries of, and naming, the proposed district if the latter proceeding is not instituted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Election on Formation [34400. - 34425.]



  ARTICLE 1. Calling the Election [34400. - 34403.]

34400.

After making and entering the order establishing and describing the boundaries of, and naming, the proposed district, the board shall forthwith call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed district for the purposes of determining whether or not it shall be formed and electing persons to fill the offices of the proposed district if it is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34401.

The notice of the election shall contain:

(a) Date and hours of election.

(b) Place of polls.

(c) Description of the boundaries of the proposed district.

(d) Name of the proposed district.

(e) Offices for which candidates shall be elected at the election.

(f) A statement that all voters and legal representatives of voters may vote either in person or by proxy at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34402.

Notice of the election shall be published once a week for at least three weeks previous to the election in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34402.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

34402.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

34402.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

34402.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 241.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

34403.

The board shall at the time of calling the formation election for the proposed district, prescribe the procedure for nominating candidates for the offices to be filled at that election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1676.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conduct of Election [34420. - 34425.]

34420.

The board shall designate the polling place for the election and appoint from the persons eligible to the office of district director a board of election. The board may provide for the payment of reasonable compensation for the services of the members of the board of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

34421.

For the convenience of voters the board may divide the proposed district into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the precincts. In such case the board shall appoint a board of election for each precinct and designate a polling place in each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34422.

At the election the last equalized assessment roll of each affected county shall be used in lieu of the district assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34423.

At the election the elective officers shall be elected but only one person shall be elected to fill the offices consolidated, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34424.

The election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as may be pursuant to Chapters 1 and 2 of Part 4 of this division and the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34425.

The returns of the election shall be forwarded to the board which shall meet on the second Monday following the election and canvass the returns and declare the results.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Establishment of District [34500. - 34502.]

34500.

If upon the canvass of the returns it appears that a majority of all the votes cast favor the formation of the district, the board shall by an order entered on its minutes declare the territory formed as a district under the name designated for it and shall issue certificates of election to the persons elected to district offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.

The board shall immediately file for record in the office of the county recorder of each affected county a certified copy of the order declaring the district formed along with a certificate listing all of the following:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing the boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of the boundaries has been recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

34502.

With the filing for record of the order declaring the district formed the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Validating Proceedings [34530. - 34530.]

34530.

An action to determine the legality of the existence of a district may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1528.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Change in Boundaries of Principal County [34575. - 34577.]

34575.

If at any time after the formation of a district the boundaries of the principal county are changed so as to exclude therefrom all of the land of the district situated in that county, the records and documents of the district in the possession of the board of supervisors of that county, together with a certified copy of the proceedings had by the district under jurisdiction of that board of supervisors shall be transferred and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which the greater portion of the land of the district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34576.

All documents which have been recorded with the recorder of the principal county and which, or a certified copy thereof, have not been recorded in the county to which the district is transferred, shall be certified to by the county recorder of the principal county and recorded with the county recorder of the county to which the district is transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

34577.

After the transfer of documents pursuant to this chapter, the board of supervisors of the county to which the district is transferred shall have and exercise all of the jurisdiction, power, and authority over the district theretofore exercised by the board of supervisors of the principal county and any act or duty which is in this division required to be done by the board of supervisors or any officer of the principal county shall be performed by the corresponding board of supervisors or officer of the county to which the district has been transferred. After the transfer the district shall conduct and manage its affairs through its proper officials and in conjunction with the proper officials of each affected county as though the district was originally formed in the county to which it was transferred, which county shall thereafter be the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Madera Water District [34580. - 34583.]

34580.

The Madera Water District created pursuant to the Madera Water District Act (Chapter 735 of the Statutes of 1987) is hereby continued as a district under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

34581.

(a) The first board of directors of the Madera Water District, as a district under this division, shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Madera.

(b) The board of directors of the Madera Water District, as a district created pursuant to the Madera Water District Act (Chapter 735 of the Statutes of 1987) serving on December 31, 1992, shall continue to serve on and after January 1, 1993, until the first board of directors of the Madera Water District, as a district under this division, is appointed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The first board of directors of the Madera Water District, as a district under this division, that is appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall hold office until their successors are elected or appointed and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

34582.

The successors to three of the first directors of the Madera Water District, as a district under this division, chosen by lot, shall be elected at the general district election held on November 2, 1993, and the successors to the remaining two directors shall be elected at the general district election held on November 7, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

34583.

The Madera Water District, as a district under this division, succeeds to actions taken, rights acquired, and obligations undertaken by the Madera Water District created pursuant to the Madera Water District Act (Chapter 735 of the Statutes of 1987).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [34700. - 34900.]



  CHAPTER 1. Officers [34700. - 34741.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualifications and Tenure [34700. - 34713.]

34700.

Each director shall be one of the following:

(a) A holder of title to land within the district.

(b) The legal representative of a holder of title to land within the district in accordance with Section 34030.

(c) A representative designated by a holder of title to land within the district, if the holder has filed with the district written evidence of that designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

34701.

Officers take office as soon as they qualify except that officers elected or appointed pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law shall take office at noon on the first Friday in December next following the general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

34705.

The term of office of each elective officer subsequent to the officers elected at the formation election is four years or until his successor qualifies and takes office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34707.

If any office becomes vacant from any cause it shall be filled by appointment by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34707.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a vacancy in the office of board member who was elected to office shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

34708.

At any time after four years from the date of the formation of a district, and from time to time thereafter, but not less than 120 days before a general district election, the board may, by resolution, increase the number of directors to serve thereon to 7, 9 or 11, and may designate the first additional members to serve on said enlarged board. The board shall determine the term of office of each of the new directors so appointed, but in no event shall such term designated by the board be for more than four years. The terms of office thus created shall be determined in such a manner as to keep as nearly equal as practicable the number of directors to be elected at each subsequent general district election. Upon the expiration of such term so designated by the board said directorship shall be filled at the next general district election and general district elections held thereafter for the election of officers of the district. The term of office of each director elected at a general district election is four years or until his successor qualifies and takes office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1045, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

34708.5.

At any time after the adoption of a resolution pursuant to Section 34708, such resolution may be repealed by a unanimous vote of the members of the board. Immediately upon the effective date of the repeal of the resolution, the offices created thereby shall be deemed vacated and abolished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

34709.

Notwithstanding Section 34900, any elective officer other than a director may appoint so many deputies as the board shall have authorized for whose acts he and his bondsmen are responsible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

34710.

Deputies shall hold office at the pleasure of the appointing officer and shall receive such compensation as may be provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

34711.

The treasurer shall be appointed by the board and serve at its pleasure. At least 90 days before the date of a general district election wherein the offices of assessor and tax collector will be subject to election, the board may determine that these officers shall henceforth be appointed by the board to serve at its pleasure, or, if a board has adopted the alternative provisions of Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 37200) of this division, it may by resolution eliminate these district offices. A person appointed pursuant to this section need not be a resident or elector of the district. Any person holding an elective office affected by this section may serve the remainder of the current term of office. The offices of treasurer, assessor and tax collector, or any combination thereof, may be held by the same person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

34712.

At least 90 days before the date of a general district election, the board may determine that the offices of assessor and tax collector, or either of them, which are currently appointive shall be filled by election at the next succeeding district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

34713.

A person elected on the basis of one man-one vote to the board of directors of a California water district, which district has been authorized by the Legislature to convert on a phased basis from a landowner voting basis to a one man-one vote basis, may serve out the remainder of the elected term after being elected, for the first time, to the office of director of a municipal water district which encompasses, in whole or in part, the California water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 634.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Consolidation and Segregation [34725. - 34727.]

34725.

The board may consolidate the offices of assessor and tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

34726.

The order of consolidation of offices shall be made at least 90 days prior to a general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34727.

The board may, at least 90 days before a general district election, segregate any offices which have previously been consolidated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compensation [34740. - 34741.]

34740.

The bylaws shall fix the compensation to be paid to all officers. The compensation received by directors shall not exeed that specified in Section 34741.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 613.)
-------------------------------------------

34741.

Until their compensation is fixed by the adoption of bylaws, the officers shall receive the following compensation for their services:

(a) The secretary, tax collector, treasurer, and assessor, such sums as shall be fixed by the board.

(b) Each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Board [34800. - 34808.]

34800.

The board shall elect a president from its members and appoint the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34801.

The board shall select and maintain an office for the district, at a fixed place which place need not be within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

34802.

The board shall hold regular meetings at such time and place as may be agreed upon by resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

34803.

Special meetings of the board shall be held pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 9 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

34804.

Notwithstanding Section 54954 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the Board of Directors of the Elsinore Water District may conduct its meetings at the district office, or at any publicly owned location that is within the boundaries, or not more than one mile outside the boundaries, of the territory over which the district exercises jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective June 2, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

34805.

A majority of the membership of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board for the transaction of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

34806.

The vote of a majority of the directors present at any meeting attended by a quorum is necessary to determine any proposition or resolution presented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34807.

The board, except as otherwise specifically provided, shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34808.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Secretary [34850. - 34851.]

34850.

The secretary shall keep a record of all the proceedings had at meetings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34851.

All documents pertaining to district affairs shall be filed in the office of the district with the secretary and shall be open to inspection at all times by any person interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Other Officers and Employees [34900. - 34900.]

34900.
